Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-401
Nebraska Library Commission; members; term.

A Nebraska Library Commission is hereby established composed of six members to be appointed by the Governor, one to serve one year, one for two years, one for three years, one for four years, and one for five years, and thereafter the Governor shall appoint a new member annually to serve for a term of three years and no person shall be appointed to more than two successive terms. The new member provided for by this section shall be appointed for an initial term of three years. The term of one of the three members whose term expires in 1981 shall expire in 1980. That member shall be selected by lot.

Laws 1935, c. 115, § 1, p. 370;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 51-501;

R.S.1943, § 51-401;

Laws 1972, LB 1033, § 4;

Laws 1979, LB 352, § 1.